District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-3618

Severability.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 633, Pub. L. 88-503, § 19
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-133, § 2(f), 27 DCR 4417
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2618.
1973 Ed., § 2-2417.